Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.370

Mobile homes, recreational or commercial vehicles—Leased, sold, or manufactured in state prior to July 1, 1968—Compliance not required—Exception.

Any mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer leased or sold in Washington and manufactured prior to July 1, 1968, which has not been inspected prior to its sale and which does not meet the requirements prescribed will not be required to comply with those requirements except for alterations or installations referred to in RCW 43.22.360.

[ 1999 c 22 s 5; 1995 c 280 s 8; 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 229 s 2; 1967 c 157 s 4.]